Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.015

Cost of administration—Fees.

Pursuant to RCW 43.24.086 and 43.135.055, the department may increase fees as necessary to defray the cost of administering *chapter 105, Laws of 2008 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6347).

[ 2008 c 285 s 29.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2008 c 285 s 29 referenced Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6347. Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6437 was apparently intended.

Intent—Captions not law—Effective date—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.